apertium-sum.sum.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>

<alphabet>ABCČĆDDžĐEFGHIJKLLjMNNjOPRSŠTUVZŽabcčćddžđefghijklljmnnjoprsštuvzž-{}()1234567890</alphabet>


<sdefs>
<sdef n="n"/>
<sdef n="pn"/>
<sdef n="nu"/>
</sdefs>


<pardef>

<pardef n="Dadani__n">
<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="pn"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="dumu__n">
<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="lugal__n">
<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="iti__n">
<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


</pardef>

<section id="main" type="standard">
<e lm="Dadani"><i>da-da-ni</i><par n="Dadani__n"/></e>
<e lm="dumu"><i>dumu</i><par n="dumu__n"/></e>
<e lm="lugal"><i>lugal</i><par n="lugal__n"/></e>
<e lm="iti"><i>iti</i><par n="iti__n"/></e>
</section>


</dictionary>
